Virginia statutes. Title 43. Mechanics’ and Certain Other Liens.
Chapter 4. Liens of Innkeepers, Livery Stable, Garage and Marina Keepers, Mechanics and Bailees.

§ 43-31.
Lien of innkeepers, etc.

Every innkeeper and the keeper of a boardinghouse or house of private entertainment shall have a lien upon, and may retain possession of, the baggage and other property of his guest or boarder brought upon his premises, and also upon the property of the employer of such guest or boarder, controlled and brought upon the premises by such guest or boarder in the course of his employment, for the proper charges due from such guest for his board and lodging.

History.

Code 1919, § 6444.

Law Review.

For note, “Effect of the Uniform Commercial Code on Virginia Law,” see 20 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 267 (1963).

For case comment on the innkeeper’s lien and due process, see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 447 (1971).

28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 481 (1971).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-501 Summons for Lien of Mechanic for Repairs in General District Court; No. 6-502 et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 97; 16 M.J. Schools, § 2.

§ 43-32.
Lien of keeper of livery stable, marina, etc.

Every keeper of a livery stable, hangar, tie-down, or marina, and every person pasturing or keeping any horses or other animals, boats, aircraft, or harness, shall have a lien upon such horses and other animals, boats, aircraft, and harness, for the amount that may be due him for the towing, storage, recovery, keeping, supporting, and care thereof, until such amount is paid.

In the case of any boat or aircraft subject to a chattel mortgage, security agreement, deed of trust, or other instrument securing money, the keeper of the marina, hangar, or tie-down shall have a lien thereon for his reasonable charges for storage under this section not to exceed $500 and for alteration and repair under §

43-33

not to exceed $1,000. However, in the case of a storage lien, to obtain the priority for an amount in excess of $300, the person asserting the lien shall make a reasonable attempt to notify any secured party of record at the Department of Wildlife Resources by telephonic means and shall give written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to any secured party of record at the Department of Wildlife Resources within seven business days of taking possession of the boat or aircraft. If the secured party does not, within seven business days of receipt of the notice, take or refuse redelivery to it or its designee, the lienor shall be entitled to priority for the full amount of storage charges, not to exceed $500. Notwithstanding a redelivery, the watercraft shall be subject to subsection D.

In addition, any person furnishing services involving the towing and recovery of a boat or aircraft shall have a lien for all normal costs incident thereto, if the person asserting the lien gives written notice within seven days of receipt of the boat or aircraft by certified mail, return receipt requested, to all secured parties of record at the Department of Wildlife Resources.

In addition, any keeper shall be entitled to a lien against any proceeds remaining after the satisfaction of all prior security interests or liens and may retain possession of such property until such charges are paid.

History.

Code 1919, § 6445; 1968, c. 320; 1970, c. 56; 1976, c. 77; 1977, c. 382; 1981, c. 453; 1984, c. 396; 1988, c. 120; 1990, c. 665; 1992, c. 403; 1999, c. 533; 2004, c. 215; 2005, c. 98; 2006, cc. 874, 891; 2009, c. 664; 2016, c. 397; 2020, c. 958.

Cross references.

As to misdemeanor for defrauding person holding a lien on an animal, see §

18.2-188.1

. As to misdemeanor for defrauding keeper of watercraft, see §

18.2-189

. For liens on motor vehicles for garage keepers or mechanics, see §§

46.2-644.01

and

46.2-644.02

, respectively.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 664, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2009.”

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “$625” for “$500,” and substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C” in the last sentence; and redesignated former subsections B through E as subsections C through F.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 215 substituted “$800” for “$625” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 98, in subsection B, substituted “$500” for “$300” twice, “$300” for “$150,” and “three business days” for “seven days,” and inserted “make a reasonable attempt to notify any secured party of record at the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries by telephonic means and shall” and “within three business days of taking possession of the boat, aircraft or vehicle”; and substituted “return it to the owner if the owner claims the items prior to auction” for “promptly return it to the owner” in subsection E.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 874 and 891 are identical, and inserted “towing, storage, recovery” in subsection A; and in subsection B, substituted “seven business days” for “three business days” in the second and third sentences and “amount of storage charges, not to exceed $500” for “$500” in the third sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 664, effective October 1, 2009, substituted “boat or aircraft” for “boat, aircraft, or vehicle” in the first and second sentences in subsection B and two places in subsection C and deleted “Department of Motor Vehicles or the” preceding “Department” in two places in the second sentence in subsection B and in subsection C; in subsection A, substituted “tie-down, or marina and every person‘ for “tie-down, marina, or garage, and every person” and deleted “vehicles” following “animals” in two places; in subsection B, substituted “hangar, or tie-down” for “hangar, or tie-down, or garage” in the first sentence and deleted “vehicle or” preceding “watercraft”; and deleted subsections E and F, pertaining to which read: “E. Any lien created under this section shall not extend to any personal property which is not attached to or considered to be necessary for the proper operation of any motor vehicle, and it shall be the duty of any keeper of such personal property to return it to the owner if the owner claims the items prior to auction.” and “F. For the purposes of this section, in the case of a truck or combination of vehicles, the owner or in the case of a rented or leased vehicle, the lessee of the truck or tractor truck shall be liable for the costs of the towing, recovery, and storage of the cargo and of any trailer or semitrailer in the combination. Nothing in this subsection, however, shall bar the owner of the truck or tractor truck from subsequently seeking to recover from the owner of any trailer, semitrailer, or cargo all or any portion of these towing, recovery, and storage costs.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 397, in subsection A, substituted “that may be” for “which may be”; and substituted “$1,000” for “$800” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” twice in subsection B and once in subsection C.

Law Review.

For note, “Effect of the Uniform Commercial Code on Virginia Law,” see 20 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 267 (1963).

For survey of recent legislation on liens, as to keepers of garages and marinas, see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 198 (1970).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1387 (1970).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 13-317. Agreement to Quarantine and Board Horses.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Animals, § 7; 2B M.J. Automobiles, § 130; 2B M.J. Bankruptcy, § 77; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 95, 100; 8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, § 10; 12A M.J. Livery Stables, § 2; 12B M.J. Mechanics’ Liens, § 8.

§ 43-33.
Lien of mechanic for repairs.

Every mechanic who shall alter or repair any article of personal property at the request of the owner of such property shall have a lien thereon for his just and reasonable charges therefor and may retain possession of such property until such charges are paid.

And every mechanic who shall make necessary alterations or repairs on any article of personal property which from its character requires the making of ordinary repairs thereto as a reasonable incident to its reasonable and customary use, at the request of any person legally in possession thereof under a reservation of title contract, chattel mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument securing money, the person so in possession having authority to use such property, shall have a lien thereon for his just and reasonable charges therefor to the extent of $1,000. In addition, such mechanic shall be entitled to a lien against the proceeds, if any, remaining after the satisfaction of all prior security interests or liens and may retain possession of such property until such charges are paid. In any action to enforce the lien hereby given all persons having an interest in the property sought to be subjected shall be made parties defendant.

If the owner of the property held by the mechanic shall desire to obtain possession thereof, he shall make the mechanic defendant in proceeding in the county or municipal court to recover the property.

The owner may give a bond payable to the court, in a penalty of the amount equal to the lien claimed by the mechanic and court costs, with security to be approved by the clerk, and conditioned for the performance of the final judgment of the court on the trial of the proceeding, and with a further condition to the effect that, if upon the hearing, the judgment of the court be that the lien of the mechanic on such property, or any part thereof, be enforced, judgment may thereupon be entered against the obligors on such bond for the amount due the mechanic and court costs, if assessed against the owner, without further or other proceedings against them thereon. Upon giving of the bond, the property shall be delivered to the owner.

History.

Code 1919, § 6443; 1924, p. 638; 1956, c. 558; 1966, c. 458; 1968, c. 395; 1973, c. 492; 1974, c. 166; 1980, c. 598; 1984, c. 396; 1999, c. 533; 2005, c. 280; 2016, c. 397.

Cross references.

As to misdemeanor for defrauding keeper of motor vehicles or watercraft, see §

18.2-189

.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “$625” for “$500” at the end of the first sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 280 substituted “$800” for “$625” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 397 substituted “$1,000” for “$800.”

Law Review.

For note, “Effect of the Uniform Commercial Code on Virginia Law,” see 20 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 267 (1963).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1387 (1970).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-501 Summons for Lien of Mechanic for Repairs in General District Court; No. 6-502 et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 100; 12B M.J. Mechanics’ Liens, § 9.

§ 43-34.
Enforcement of liens acquired under §§ 43-31 through 43-33 and of liens of bailees.

For the purposes of this section, “public place” means a premises owned by the Commonwealth or a political subdivision thereof, or an agency of either, that is open to the general public.

Any person having a lien under §§

43-31

through

43-33

and any bailee, except where otherwise provided, having a lien as such at common law on personal property in his possession that he has no power to sell for the satisfaction of the lien, if the debt for which the lien exists is not paid within 10 days after it is due and the value of the property affected by the lien does not exceed $10,000, may sell such property or so much thereof as may be necessary, by public auction, for cash. The proceeds shall be applied to the satisfaction of the debt and expenses of sale, and the surplus, if any, shall be paid within 30 days of the sale to any lienholder, and then to the owner of the property. A seller who fails to remit the surplus as provided shall be liable to the person entitled to the surplus in an amount equal to $50 for each day beyond 30 days that the failure continues.

Before making the sale, the seller shall advertise the time, place, and terms thereof in any of the following places: (i) a public place in the county or city where the property is located; (ii) a website operated by the Commonwealth, the county or city where the property is located, or a political subdivision of either; or (iii) a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city where the property is located, either in print or on its website. In the case of property other than a motor vehicle required to be registered in Virginia having a value in excess of $600, 10 days’ prior notice shall be given to any secured party who has filed a financing statement against the property, and written notice shall be given to the owner as hereinafter provided.

If the value of the property is more than $10,000 but does not exceed $25,000, the party having the lien, after giving notice as herein provided, may apply by petition to any general district court of the county or city wherein the property is, or, if the value of the property exceeds $25,000, to the circuit court of the county or city, for the sale of the property. If, on the hearing of the case on the petition, the defense, if any made thereto, and such evidence as may be adduced by the parties respectively, the court is satisfied that the debt and lien are established and the property should be sold to pay the debt, the court shall order the sale to be made by the sheriff of the county or city. The sheriff shall make the same and apply and dispose of the proceeds in the same manner as if the sale were made under a writ of fieri facias.

If the owner of the property is a resident of the Commonwealth, any notice required by this section may be served as provided in §

8.01-296

or, if the sale is to be made without resort to the courts, by personal delivery or by certified or registered mail delivered to the present owner of the property to be sold at his last known address at least 10 days prior to the date of sale. If the owner of the property is a nonresident or if his address is unknown, any notice required by this section may be served by posting a copy thereof in three of any of the following places in any combination: (i) one or more public places in the county or city where the property is located; (ii) one or more websites operated by the Commonwealth, the county or city where the property is located, or a political subdivision of either; or (iii) one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county or city where the property is located, either in print or on their websites.

History.

Code 1919, § 6449; 1960, c. 571; 1968, c. 605; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1978, c. 59; 1980, c. 598; 1987, c. 37; 1988, c. 227; 1992, c. 111; 1993, c. 759; 1998, c. 868; 2002, c. 401; 2004, c. 369; 2006, cc. 874, 891; 2008, c. 171; 2009, c. 664; 2011, cc. 14, 702; 2014, c. 339; 2016, c. 397; 2019, c. 560.

Cross references.

As to transfer by operation of law a watercraft titling certificate, see § 29.1-717.2. For liens on motor vehicles for garage keepers and mechanics, see §

46.2-644.03

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 664, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2009.”

The 1998 amendment,

effective July 1, 1999, in the third paragraph, substituted “$15,000” for “$10,000” in two places; added the present fifth paragraph; and in the last paragraph, substituted “thirty days” for “ninety days.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 401 substituted “$5,000” for “$3,000” in the first and third paragraphs.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 369, throughout the section, substituted “10” for “ten” and “30” for “thirty”; substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars” in the last sentence of the first paragraph; and inserted “or a nonrepairable certificate” in the fifth and sixth paragraphs.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 874 and 891 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “$7,500” for “$5,000” in the first sentence and “$50” for “$25” in the third sentence; substituted “$7,500” for “$5,000” in the first sentence of the third paragraph; and substituted “$3,000” for “$1,000” in clause (iii) of the fifth paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 171 added the last sentence of the second paragraph; added the last paragraph; and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 664, effective October 1, 2009, deleted the last four sentences of the second paragraph pertaining to showing of lien for motor vehicles on certificate of title and notification sent to lienholder by mail; and deleted the former last four paragraphs, pertaining specifically to liens on motor vehicles.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 14 and 702 are identical, and twice substituted “$25,000” for “$15,000” in the third paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 339, in the first and third paragraphs, substituted “$10,000” for “$7,500.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 397 substituted “in his possession that” for “in his possession which” in the first paragraph, and in the last paragraph, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in the first sentence and rewrote the second sentence, which read “If he is a nonresident or if his address is unknown, notice may be served by posting a copy thereof in three public places in the county or city wherein the property is located”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 560 transferred the former last sentence to the beginning of the section as the first paragraph; in the third paragraph, inserted “any of the following places: (i)” and “in the county or city where the property is located; (ii) a website operated by the Commonwealth, the county or city where the property is located, or a political subdivision of either; or (iii) a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city where the property is located, either in print or on its website.”

Law Review.

For case comment on the innkeeper’s lien and due process, see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 447 (1971).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-501 Summons for Lien of Mechanic for Repairs in General District Court; No. 6-502 et seq.; No. 8A-1001 Contract Creating a Bailment.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Liens, § 22.

§ 43-34.1.
Lien of keeper of hangar or tie-down on aircraft subject to a chattel mortgage.

In the case of any aircraft subject to a chattel mortgage, security agreement, deed of trust or other instrument securing money, the keeper of the hangar or tie-down shall have a lien thereon for his usual and reasonable charges for storage, alteration or repair from the time such lien is perfected as provided herein.
Such lien is nonpossessory and shall be deemed a conveyance.
To perfect such lien, the following shall be required:

The claim of lien shall be signed, under oath, by the claimant, his agent or attorney;

The claim of lien shall also be filed within 120 days after completion of alterations or repair or accrual of storage charges, as personal property security interests or liens are recorded, with the State Corporation Commission in accordance with the applicable provisions of Part 5 (§

8.9A-501

et seq.) of Title 8.9A; and

The claim of lien shall also be filed within such 120-day period with the Aircraft Registration Branch of the Federal Aviation Administration.

History.

1993, c. 854.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Mechanics’ Liens, § 8.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Manager found to be keeper. —

Manager was a keeper and a person keeping aircraft within the plain meaning of the word for purposes of establishing a lien on an aircraft where it arranged for and provided hangar space for the owner’s aircraft, coordinated and provided services necessary to maintain and legally operate the aircraft, and, as a lessee, was accountable for all activities that occurred in the hangar and/or tie-down space. Gold Key Aviation, L.L.C. v. Int'l Jet Charter, Inc., 56 Va. Cir. 421, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 482 (Norfolk Sept. 19, 2001).

Recordation of claim with Virginia State Corporation Commission not required. —

Section 55-100 modifies §

43-34.1

by negating the need for filing notice of the claim by the lienor with the Virginia State Corporation Commission; similarly, compliance with § 55-100 rendered the requirements of former § 8.9-403, a Virginia finance statement filing statute, unnecessary. Gold Key Aviation, L.L.C. v. Int'l Jet Charter, Inc., 56 Va. Cir. 421, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 482 (Norfolk Sept. 19, 2001).

§ 43-35.
How and when validity of lien, or claim of other person to property, is tried.

Any person may file his petition, at any time before the property is sold or the proceeds of sale are paid to the plaintiff under the judgment of the court, disputing the validity of the plaintiff’s lien thereon, or stating a claim thereto, or an interest in or lien on the same, and its nature; and the court shall inquire into such claim, and if it be found that the petitioner has title to, or a lien on, or any interest in, such property or proceeds of sale, the court shall make such order as is necessary to protect his rights.

History.

Code 1919, § 6450; 2005, c. 839.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, deleted “trial justice or” three times preceding “court” and substituted “court” for “the court, as the case may be” preceding “shall inquire.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Interpleader, §§ 1, 14.

§ 43-36.
Appeals, how taken and tried.

Any party may appeal from the judgment of the general district court, as in case of warrants for small claims under Chapter 6 (§ 16.1-76 et seq.) of Title 16.1, and such appeal shall be heard and determined in like manner, as appeals under such chapter.

History.

Code 1919, § 6451; 2005, c. 839.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “general district court” for “trial justice.”

§ 43-37.
Sale of baggage and other personal property held pursuant to § 43-31 or unclaimed.

Whenever any baggage or other personal property is being held by a hotel pursuant to the lien granted by §

43-31

, or where such baggage or other personal property has been voluntarily checked with a hotel, such baggage and other personal property may be sold at public auction for cash after it has been so held or checked and has remained unclaimed for more than sixty days, provided that before such sale is held written notice of such sale stating the date and place thereof and a brief description of such baggage or other personal property and the name of the owner thereof, if known, and the amount of the charges, if any, against the same, is sent by registered mail to such owner, if known, at his last known address, if known, at least ten days prior to such sale, and provided that such notice is publicly posted in the lobby of such hotel at least ten days prior to such sale.

History.

1940, p. 269; Michie Code 1942, § 6451b.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, § 4.

§ 43-38.
Withdrawal from such sale upon payment of charges, interest and expenses.

Such baggage or other personal property shall be withdrawn from sale and released to the owner thereof upon payment to such hotel, at any time prior to such sale, of the debt or charges, if any, against the same, with legal interest thereon and the expenses incurred in preparation for such sale prior to such payment.

History.

1940, p. 270; Michie Code 1942, § 6451c.

§ 43-39.
Distribution of proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of sale shall be applied to the expenses of such sale, including the expense of notices, and to the satisfaction of the debt or charges, if any, with legal interest against such baggage or other personal property. The surplus, if any, shall be paid by the hotel to the owner of such baggage or other personal property, upon written application filed with such hotel by the owner within thirty days after such sale. If no such application is so filed, then such hotel shall pay over such surplus to the State Treasurer, who shall credit the same to the Literary Fund. Compliance by a hotel with the provisions of this and the two preceding sections (§§

43-37

,

43-38

) shall be a complete bar and defense to any claim that may thereafter be made by anyone against such hotel on account of such baggage or other personal property.

History.

1940, p. 270; Michie Code 1942, § 6451d.

§ 43-40.
Subsequent payment of surplus proceeds to persons entitled thereto.

At any time within ten years after the payment into the state treasury of the surplus proceeds of any such sale as provided in the preceding section (§

43-39

), the former owner or owners of the property so sold, upon evidence of such ownership satisfactory to the Comptroller, shall be paid the principal amount of such surplus proceeds so paid into the state treasury out of any moneys held in reserve on the books of the Department of Accounts for the benefit of the Literary Fund upon warrant of the Comptroller. If any such claim be disallowed in whole or in part by the Comptroller, it may be recovered in the manner and subject to the conditions and limitations provided in §§

8.01-192

through

8.01-195

and

8.01-255

for recovering claims against the Commonwealth.

History.

1940, p. 270; Michie Code 1942, § 6451e.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, § 4.